Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1137
Administration of anesthesia or sedation; permit required; exception.

A dentist licensed in this state shall not administer general anesthesia, deep sedation, moderate sedation, or minimal sedation in the practice of dentistry unless he or she has been issued the appropriate permit pursuant to the Dentistry Practice Act. A dentist licensed in this state may administer inhalation analgesia in the practice of dentistry without a permit pursuant to the act.

Laws 1986, LB 438, § 3;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-193.23;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 470;

Laws 2015, LB80, § 7.